Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.900

Effective date, implementation—1991 c 355.

This act shall take effect January 1, 1992. The director shall take such steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date.

[ 1994 c 92 s 292; 1991 c 355 s 24.]